Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 6.2 Child Care — State Subsidies

40-6.2-1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 171, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 23, P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 23, P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 23 and P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 23, effective on the later of May 1, 1997 or the first day of the second month following the month of receipt by the Rhode Island Department of Human Services of all federal approvals and/or federal waivers from the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services necessary to implement the provisions of the acts, provided, however, that the Rhode Island Department of Human Services is authorized and directed to seek such federal approvals and/or federal waivers upon passage of the acts.

40-6.2-1.1.
Rates established.

Through June 30, 2015, subject to the payment limitations in subsection (c), the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers and licensed family childcare providers shall be based on the following schedule of the 75th percentile of the 2002 weekly market rates adjusted for the average of the 75th percentile of the 2002 and the 2004 weekly market rates:

Effective July 1, 2015, subject to the payment limitations in subsection (c), the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers and licensed family childcare providers shall be based on the above schedule of the 75th percentile of the 2002 weekly market rates adjusted for the average of the 75th percentile of the 2002 and the 2004 weekly market rates. These rates shall be increased by ten dollars ($10.00) per week for infant/toddler care provided by licensed family childcare providers and license-exempt providers and then the rates for all providers for all age groups shall be increased by three percent (3%). For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2018, licensed childcare centers shall be reimbursed a maximum weekly rate of one hundred ninety-three dollars and sixty-four cents ($193.64) for infant/toddler care and one hundred sixty-one dollars and seventy-one cents ($161.71) for preschool-age children.

Effective July l, 2018, subject to the payment limitations in subsection (c), the maximum infant/toddler and preschool-age reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall be implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within the state’s quality rating system outlined in §

42-12-23.1

.

For infant/toddler child care, tier one shall be reimbursed two and one-half percent (2.5%) above the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier two shall be reimbursed five percent (5%) above the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier three shall be reimbursed thirteen percent (13%) above the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier four shall be reimbursed twenty percent (20%) above the FY 2018 weekly amount, and tier five shall be reimbursed thirty-three percent (33%) above the FY 2018 weekly amount.

For preschool reimbursement rates, tier one shall be reimbursed two and one-half (2.5%) percent above the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier two shall be reimbursed five percent (5%) above the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier three shall be reimbursed ten percent (10%) above the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier four shall be reimbursed thirteen percent (13%) above the FY 2018 weekly amount, and tier five shall be reimbursed twenty-one percent (21%) above the FY 2018 weekly amount.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 4.]

By June 30, 2004, and biennially through June 30, 2014, the department of labor and training shall conduct an independent survey or certify an independent survey of the then-current weekly market rates for child care in Rhode Island and shall forward the weekly market rate survey to the department of human services. The next survey shall be conducted by June 30, 2016, and triennially thereafter. The departments of human services and labor and training will jointly determine the survey criteria including, but not limited to, rate categories and sub-categories.

In order to expand the accessibility and availability of quality child care, the department of human services is authorized to establish, by regulation, alternative or incentive rates of reimbursement for quality enhancements, innovative or specialized child care, and alternative methodologies of childcare delivery, including nontraditional delivery systems and collaborations.

Effective January 1, 2007, all childcare providers have the option to be paid every two (2) weeks and have the option of automatic direct deposit and/or electronic funds transfer of reimbursement payments.

Effective July 1, 2019, the maximum infant/toddler reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments of human services and children, youth and families for licensed family childcare providers shall be implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within the state’s quality rating system outlined in §

42-12-23.1

. Tier one shall be reimbursed two percent (2%) above the prevailing base rate for step 1 and step 2 providers, three percent (3%) above prevailing base rate for step 3 providers, and four percent (4%) above the prevailing base rate for step 4 providers; tier two shall be reimbursed five percent (5%) above the prevailing base rate; tier three shall be reimbursed eleven percent (11%) above the prevailing base rate; tier four shall be reimbursed fourteen percent (14%) above the prevailing base rate; and tier five shall be reimbursed twenty-three percent (23%) above the prevailing base rate.

Through December 31, 2021, the maximum reimbursement rates paid by the departments of human services, and children, youth and families to licensed childcare centers shall be consistent with the enhanced emergency rates provided as of June 1, 2021, as follows:

The maximum reimbursement rates paid by the departments of human services, and children, youth and families to licensed family childcare providers shall be consistent with the enhanced emergency rates provided as of June 1, 2021, as follows:

Effective January 1, 2022, the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall be implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within the state’s quality rating system outlined in §

42-12-23.1

. Maximum weekly rates shall be reimbursed as follows:

Licensed Childcare Centers

The maximum reimbursement rates for licensed family childcare providers paid by the departments of human services, and children, youth and families is determined through collective bargaining. The maximum reimbursement rates for infant/toddler and preschool age children paid to licensed family childcare providers by both departments is implemented in a tiered manner that reflects the quality rating the provider has achieved in accordance with §

42-12-23.1

.

(j)

Effective July 1, 2022, the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall be implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Maximum weekly rates shall be reimbursed as follows:

Licensed Childcare Centers

Licensed Childcare Centers 75th Percentile of Weekly Market Rate Infant $182.00 Preschool $150.00 School-Age $135.00

Click to view

Licensed Family Childcare 75th Percentile of Weekly Providers Market Rate Infant $150.00 Preschool $150.00 School-Age $135.00

Click to view

Tier 1 Tier 2 Tier 3 Tier 4 Tier 5 Infant/Toddler $257.54 $257.54 $257.54 $257.54 $273.00 Preschool Age $195.67 $195.67 $195.67 $195.67 $260.00 School Age $200.00 $200.00 $200.00 $200.00 $245.00

Click to view

Tier 1 Tier 2 Tier 3 Tier 4 Tier 5 Infant/Toddler $224.43 $224.43 $224.43 $224.43 $224.43 Preschool Age $171.45 $171.45 $171.45 $171.45 $171.45 School Age $162.30 $162.30 $162.30 $162.30 $162.30

Click to view

Tier One Tier Two Tier Three Tier Four Tier Five Infant/Toddler $236.36 $244.88 $257.15 $268.74 $284.39 Preschool $207.51 $212.27 $218.45 $223.50 $231.39 School-Age $180.38 $182.77 $185.17 $187.57 $189.97

Click to view

Tier One Tier Two Tier Three Tier Four Tier Five Infant/Toddler $265 $270 $282 $289 $300 Infant/Toddler $225 $235 $243 $250 $260 School-Age $200 $205 $220 $238 $250

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 546, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 13; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 13; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 13; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 13; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 34, § 4; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 11, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 27, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 10, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 601, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 612, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 27, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 15, § 7; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 4; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 13, § 7, effective July 6, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2022.

Applicability.

P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 27, § 2, provides that the amendment to this section by that act takes effect upon passage [July 30, 2004] and applies to payments to child care providers for child care services rendered on and after June 6, 2004. Any rules or regulations necessary or advisable to implement the provisions of the amendment shall be effective immediately as an emergency rule upon the department’s filing thereof with the secretary of state as it is found that the current fiscal crisis in this state has caused an imminent peril to public health, safety and welfare, and the department is exempted from the requirements of
§§ 42-35-3(b) and
42-35-4(b)(2) relating to agency findings of imminent peril to public health, safety and welfare and the filing of statements of the agency’s reasons thereof.

40-6.2-2.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 488, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 14, P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 14, P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 14, and P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 14, effective on the later of May 1, 1997 or the first day of the second month following the month of receipt by the Rhode Island Department of Human Services of all federal approvals and/or federal waivers from the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services necessary to implement the provisions of the acts, provided, however, that the Rhode Island Department of Human Services is authorized and directed to seek such federal approvals and/or federal waivers upon passage of the acts.

40-6.2-3.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 255, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40-6.2-3

; Repealed by P.L. 1986, ch. 488, §§ 1, 2, effective June 25, 1986.

40-6.2-4, 40-6.2-5.
[Repealed.]